Washington statutes.
RCW 33.16.090

Board meetings—Notice—Quorum.

The board of directors of each association shall hold a regular meeting at least once each quarter and whenever required by the director, at a time to be designated by it. Special meetings of the board of directors may be held upon notice to each director sufficient to permit his or her attendance.

At any meeting of the board of directors, a majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The president of the association or chair of the board or any three members of the board may call a meeting of the board by giving notice to all of the directors.

[ 2011 c 336 s 759; 1994 c 256 s 123; 1982 c 3 s 34; 1945 c 235 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-142. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 19.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.